District of Columbia statutes.
42-3111

Damages.

In addition to equitable relief granted under this chapter, the plaintiff may request, and the court in its discretion may order damages for each day the drug-, firearm-, or prostitution-related nuisance is unabated since the date the defendant first received notice of the drug-, firearm-, or prostitution-related nuisance as provided in § 42-3103, or knew or should have known of the existence of the drug-, firearm-, or prostitution-related nuisance, whichever is earlier. Such damages shall be payable to the plaintiff, or, in the case of an action by the United States Attorney for the District of Columbia or by the Corporation Counsel, to the Drug-, Firearm-, or Prostitution-Related Nuisance Abatement Fund established by § 42-3111.01. No other damages are recoverable under this chapter.

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-194, § 12, 45 DCR 7982
Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-81, § 3(b), (d), 53 DCR 1050
Nov. 6, 2010, D.C. Law 18-259, § 7(b), 57 DCR 5591
This section is referenced in § 42-3108 and § 42-3110.
1981 Ed., § 45-3311.
D.C. Law 16-81 substituted “drug or prostitution-related” for “drug-related”; and substituted “to the Drug-, Firearm-, or Prostitution-Related Nuisance Abatement Fund established by § 42-3111.02” for “to the General Fund of the District of Columbia”.
D.C. Law 18-259 substituted “drug-, firearm-, or prostitution-related” for “drug or prostitution-related”.
See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3101.
For temporary addition of chapter, see notes to § 42-3101.